Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2003
Terms, defined.

As used in the Missing Children Identification Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) County agency means any agency in a county that records and maintains birth certificates;

(2) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(3) Missing person means a person sixteen years of age or younger reported to any law enforcement agency as abducted or lost; and

(4) Patrol means the Nebraska State Patrol.

Laws 1987, LB 599, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 208;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 83;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 137.